test/src/morphology/V-kwnwlwma55_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kõnõlõma: # Verb (55) kõnõlõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kõnõlõma+V+Inf/mA: kõnõlõma
     kõnõlõma+V+Inf: kõnõldaq
     kõnõlõma+V+ActPrtPrc: kõnõlnuq
     kõnõlõma+V+PssPrtPrc: kõnõld
     kõnõlõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: kõnõlõ
     kõnõlõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: kõnõlõs
     kõnõlõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: kõnõli
     kõnõlõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: kõnõlʼ
